Utah statutes.
31A-35-704.   Submission of bail bond sureties and producers to jurisdiction
of court.
By applying for and receiving a license or certificate to engage in the bail
bond surety insurance business in accordance with this chapter, a bail bond
surety or bail bond producer:
(1) submits to the jurisdiction of the court;
(2)  irrevocably appoints the clerk of the court as agent upon whom any papers
affecting the bail bond surety's or bail bond producer's liability on the
undertaking may be served; and
(3) acknowledges that liability may be enforced on motion and upon notice as
the court may require, without the necessity of an independent action.
